District of Columbia statutes.
47-2011

Repealed

Tax a personal debt; period of limitation; liens.

Repealed.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 117, ch. 146, title I, § 131
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 206, 29 DCR 2418
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 405(a), 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(ff)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2011.
1973 Ed., § 47-2608.
Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”